Nebraska, session 109, LB11.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB11 LB11
2025 2025
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $130,893 from the
General Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $179,795 from the General Fund for
FY2026-27 to the State Department of Education, Program 25, for purposes
of the Nebraska Statewide Workforce and Education Reporting System Act.
Sec. 2. There is hereby appropriated (1) $130,893 from the General
Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $179,795 from the General Fund for FY2026-27
to the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges, for Program 48,
for purposes of the Nebraska Statewide Workforce and Education Reporting
System Act.
Sec. 3. There is hereby appropriated (1) $130,893 from the General
Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $179,795 from the General Fund for FY2026-27
to the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska, for Program 781,
for purposes of the Nebraska Statewide Workforce and Education Reporting
System Act.
Sec. 4. There is hereby appropriated (1) $130,893 from the General
Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $179,795 from the General Fund for FY2026-27
to Agency No. 83 — Aid to Community Colleges, for Program 151, for
purposes of the Nebraska Statewide Workforce and Education Reporting
System Act.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$130,893 General Funds as state aid to community colleges, which shall be
disbursed by the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education on
behalf of the community colleges for purposes of the Nebraska Statewide
Workforce and Education Reporting System Act. There is included in the
appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $179,795 General Funds as
state aid to community colleges, which shall be disbursed by the
Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education on behalf of the
community colleges for purposes of the Nebraska Statewide Workforce and
Education Reporting System Act.
Sec. 5. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-